Hawaii statutes.
§235-119 Taxes, state realizations.
All income taxes shall be for the use of the State and shall be paid into the
state treasury at such times as the director of finance shall direct. [L Sp
1957, c 1, pt of §2; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §14; am L 1963, c 114, §1; Supp,
§121-52; HRS §235-119]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next